Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.010

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to:

(1) Provide citizens of the state of Washington with information relating to any entity that solicits funds from the public for public charitable purposes in order to prevent (a) deceptive and dishonest practices in the conduct of soliciting funds for or in the name of charity; and (b) improper use of contributions intended for charitable purposes;

(2) Improve the transparency and accountability of organizations that solicit funds from the public for charitable purposes; and

(3) Develop and operate educational programs or partnerships for charitable organizations, board members, and the general public that help build public confidence and trust in organizations that solicit funds from the public for charitable purposes.

[ 2011 c 199 s 1; 2007 c 471 s 1; 1986 c 230 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 13 s 1.]